California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
-------------------------------------------

23704.5.

Section 501(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expenditures by public charities engaged in activities to influence legislation, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) The reference to Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exemption from taxation, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701.

(b) The reference to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to charitable
 organizations, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701d.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23704.6.

Section 504 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to status after organization ceases to qualify for exemption under Section 501(c)(3) because of substantial lobbying or because of political activities, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) The reference to Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exemption from taxation, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701.

(b) The reference to Section 501a(c)(3)
 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to charitable organizations, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701d.

(c) The reference to Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to civic leagues, social welfare organizations, and local associations of employees, shall be modified to refer to Section 23701f.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23705.

(a) (1) An organization described in Section 23701i (voluntary employee’s beneficiary associations) or 23701q (qualified group legal service plans) which is part of a plan of an employer shall not be exempt from tax under Section 23701, unless that plan meets the requirements of Section 505(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to any organization described in Section 505(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) A copy of any notice filed with the Secretary of the Treasury, pursuant to Section 505(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to application for tax-exempt status, shall be filed at the same time and in the same manner with the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 56.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

23706.

Any exemption from the bank and corporation franchise tax under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) or the corporation income tax under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), granted by any California statute on or after January 1, 1985, for an organization which is an instrumentality of this state, shall be provided for in this part of the code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1461, Sec. 87.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

23707.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the status of any organization as a private foundation shall be terminated only if—

(1) Such organization notifies the Franchise Tax Board (at such time and in such manner as the Franchise Tax Board may by regulations prescribe) of its intent to accomplish such termination, or

(2) Such organization has been terminated by the Attorney General of this state or by action taken pursuant to Section 507 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) (1) The status as a private foundation of any organization shall be terminated if—

(A) Such organization distributes all of its net assets to one or more organizations described below (other than clauses (vii), (viii), (ix) or (x)) each of which has been in existence and so described for a continuous period of at least 60 calendar months immediately preceding such distribution and exempt from tax under Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code or Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code during the last 60 months, or—

(i) A church or a convention or association of churches,

(ii) An educational organization which normally maintains a regular faculty and curriculum and normally has a regularly enrolled body of pupils or
 students in attendance at the place where its educational activities are regularly carried on,

(iii) An organization the principal purpose or functions of which are the providing of medical or hospital care or medical education or medical research, if the organization is a hospital, or if the organization is a medical research organization directly engaged in the continuous active conduct of medical research in conjunction with a hospital, and during the calendar year in which the contribution is made such organization is committed to spend such contributions for such research before January 1 of the fifth calendar year which begins after the date such contribution is made.

(iv) An organization which normally receives a substantial part of its support (exclusive of income received in the exercise or performance by such organization of its charitable, educational, or other purpose
 or function constituting the basis for its exemption under Section 23701d) from the United States or any state or political subdivision thereof or from direct or indirect contributions from the general public, and which is organized and operated exclusively to receive, hold, invest, and administer property and to make expenditures to or for the benefit of a college or university which is an organization referred to in clause (ii) of this subparagraph and which is an agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision thereof, or which is owned or operated by a state or political subdivision thereof or by an agency or instrumentality of one or more states or political subdivisions,

(v) A governmental unit referred to in Section 170(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code,

(vi) An organization referred to in Section 170(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code which normally receives
 a substantial part of its support (exclusive of income received in the exercise or performance by such organization of its charitable, educational, or other purpose or function constituting the basis for its exemption under Section 23701d) from a governmental unit referred to in Section 170(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code or from direct or indirect contributions from the general public,

(vii) A private operating foundation (as defined in Section 4942(j) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code),

(viii) Any other private foundation (as defined in Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code) which, not later than the 15th day of the third month after the close of the foundation’s taxable year in which contributions are received, makes qualifying distributions (as defined in Section 4942(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by P.L. 94-455, without regard to paragraph (3) thereof),
 which are treated, after the application of Section 4942(g)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as distributions out of corpus (in accordance with Section 4942(h) of the Internal Revenue Code) in an amount equal to 100 percent of such contributions, and with respect to which the taxpayer maintains adequate records or other sufficient evidence from the foundation showing that the foundation made such qualifying distributions,

(ix) A private foundation all of the contributions to which are pooled in a common fund and which would be described in paragraph (3) of Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code but for the right of any substantial contributor (hereafter in this clause called “donor”) or his spouse to designate annually the recipients, from among organizations described in paragraph (1) of Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, of the income attributable to the donor’s contribution to the fund and to direct (by deed or by will) the
 payment, to an organization described in such paragraph (1), of the corpus in the common fund shall apply only if all the income of the common fund is required to be (and is) distributed to one or more organizations described in such paragraph (1) not later than the 15th day of the third month after the close of the taxable year in which the income is realized by the fund and only if all of the corpus attributable to any donor’s contribution to the fund is required to be (and is) distributed to one or more of such organizations not later than one year after his death or after the death of his surviving spouse if she has the right to designate the recipients of such corpus, and

(x) An organization described in paragraph (2) or (3) of Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) Such organization meets the requirements of Section 507(b)(1)(B) or paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of
 Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, whichever applies, and furnishes copies of its federal notice of termination of its private foundation status to the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) For purposes of this part, in the case of a transfer of assets of any private foundation to another private foundation pursuant to any liquidation, merger, redemption, recapitalization, or other adjustment, organization, or reorganization, the transferee foundation shall not be treated as a newly created organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 94.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

23708.

(a) For the purposes of this part, unless otherwise indicated in context, the term “an organization exempt from tax” shall mean an organization which has satisfied the provisions of Section 23701.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any organization (including an organization in existence on December 31, 1970) which is described in Section 23701d and which does not notify the Franchise Tax Board at such time and such manner as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe, that it is not a private foundation shall be presumed to be a
 private foundation. The time prescribed for giving notice under this subdivision shall not expire before the 90th day after the day on which the regulations first prescribed under this subdivision become final.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to—

(1) Churches, their integrated auxiliaries, and conventions or associations of churches, or

(2) Any organization which is not a private foundation (as defined in Section 23709).

(3) The Franchise Tax Board may by regulations exempt (to the extent and subject to such conditions as may be prescribed in such regulations) from the provisions of subdivision (b)—

(A) Educational organizations which normally maintain a regular faculty and curriculum
 and normally have a regularly enrolled body of pupils or students in attendance at the place where their educational activities are regularly carried on; and

(B) Any other class of organizations with respect to which the Franchise Tax Board determines that full compliance with the provisions of subdivision (b) is not necessary to the efficient administration of the provisions of this title relating to private foundations.

(d) (1) No gift or bequest made to an organization upon which the tax provided by Section 507(c) of the Internal Revenue Code has been imposed shall be allowed as a deduction under Section 24357, if such gift or bequest is made—

(A) By any person after notification of termination is made under Section 507(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, or

(B) By a substantial contributor (as defined in Section 507(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code) in his taxable year which includes the first day on which action is taken by such organization which culminates in the imposition of tax under Section 507(c) of the Internal Revenue Code and any subsequent taxable year.

(2) No gift or bequest made to an organization shall be allowed as a deduction under Section 24357, if such gift or bequest is made—

(A) To a private foundation or trust described in Section 4947 of the Internal Revenue Code in a taxable year for which it fails to meet the requirements of subdivision (e) of this section (determined without regard to subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of this section), or

(B) To any
 organization that has not established its exemption under Section 23701d or Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code for the period concerned.

(3) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if the entire amount of the unpaid portion of the tax imposed under Section 507(c) of the Internal Revenue Code is abated. 

(e) (1) A private foundation shall not be exempt from taxation under Section 23701d unless its governing instrument includes provisions the effects of which are—

(A) To require its income for each taxable year to be distributed at such time and in such manner as not to subject the foundation to tax under Section 4942 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by P.L. 94-455, and

(B) To prohibit the foundation from engaging in any
 act of self-dealing (as defined in Section 4941 of the Internal Revenue Code) from retaining any excess business holdings (as defined in Section 4943 of the Internal Revenue Code), from making any investments in such manner as to subject the foundation to tax under Section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) In the case of any organization organized before January 1, 1970, paragraph (1) shall not apply—

(A) To any taxable year beginning before January 1, 1972,

(B) To any period after December 31, 1971, during the pendency of any judicial proceeding begun before January 1, 1972, by the private foundation which is necessary to reform, or to excuse such foundation from compliance with, its governing instrument or any other instrument in order to meet the requirements of paragraph (1), and

(C) To any period after the termination of any judicial proceeding described in subparagraph (B) during which its governing instrument or any other instrument does not permit it to meet the requirements of paragraph (1).

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to require the inclusion in governing instruments of any provisions inconsistent with this subdivision.

(f) Notwithstanding any of the requirements of this section, if they are determined to be met under federal law they are also met for state purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 95.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

23709.

(a) For the purposes of this part the term “private foundation” means a domestic or foreign organization defined in the Internal Revenue Code as a private foundation.

(b) For the purposes of this part, if an organization is a private foundation (within the meaning of subdivision (a)) on December 31, 1970, or becomes a
 private foundation on any subsequent date, such organization shall be treated as a private foundation for all periods after December 31, 1970, or after such subsequent date, unless its status as such is terminated.

(c) For purposes of this part, an organization the status of which as a private foundation is terminated shall be treated as an organization created on the day after the date of such termination, except in the case of a transfer of assets of any private foundation to another private foundation pursuant to any liquidation, merger, redemption, recapitalization, or other adjustment, organization, or reorganization, the transferee shall not be treated as a newly created organization.

(d) For purposes of this part, the term “support” includes (but is not limited to)—(1) Gifts, grants, contributions, or membership fees,(2) Gross receipts from admissions, sales of merchandise, performance of services, or furnishing of facilities in any activity which is not an unrelated trade or business (within the meaning of Section 23734),(3) Net income from unrelated business activities, whether or not such activities are carried on regularly as a trade or business,(4) Gross investment income (as defined in subdivision (e)),(5) Tax revenues levied for the benefit of an organization and either paid to or expended on behalf of such organization,
 and(6) The value of services or facilities (exclusive of services or facilities generally furnished to the public without charge) furnished by a governmental unit referred to in Section 170(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code to an organization without charge.Such term does not include any gain from the sale or other disposition of property which would be considered as gain from the sale or exchange of a capital asset, or the value of exemption from any federal, state, or local tax or any similar benefit.

(e) For purposes of this section, the term “gross investment income” means the gross amount of income from interest, dividends, rents, and royalties, but not including any such income to the extent included in computing the tax imposed by Section 23731.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 96.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

23710.

Any organization exempted from taxes imposed under this part pursuant to the provisions of this article shall not be disqualified for such exemption on the basis that it conducts bingo games pursuant to Section 326.5 of the Penal Code, provided that the proceeds from those games are used exclusively for charitable purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 11, Sec. 58.   Effective February 19, 1988.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, by Sec. 95 of Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

23711.

Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified state tuition programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Section 529(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting the phrase “under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and this part” in lieu of the phrase “under this subtitle.”

(2) By substituting “Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731)” in lieu of “section 511.”

(b) A copy of the report required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury under
 Section 529(d) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board at the same time and in the same manner as specified in that section.

(c) (1) The amendments made by Section 302(a)(1) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to other definitions and special rules, shall apply except as otherwise provided.

(2) The amendments made by Section 302(b)(1) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to distributions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(3) The amendments made by Section
 302(c)(1) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529(c)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for contributions of refunded amounts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(d) (1) The amendments made by Section 11025(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529(c)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to change in beneficiaries or programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) (A) The amendments made by Section 11032(a)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax treatment of designated beneficiaries and contributors, shall not apply,
 except as otherwise provided.

(B) The amendments made by Section 11032(a)(2) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529(e)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified higher education expenses, shall not apply, except as otherwise provided.

(C) In the case of any distribution made under Section 529(e)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Section 11032(a)(2) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), that would be treated for federal income tax purposes as a “qualified higher education expense” under Section 529(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 11032(a)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), the
 amount of that distribution shall, notwithstanding anything in Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code to the contrary, be includable in the gross income of the distributee in the manner as provided under Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(D) Any distribution includable in the gross income of a distributee under subparagraph (C) shall not affect the exempt status of the qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of this part.

(e) (1) Section 529(c)(3)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rollovers to Roth IRAs from long-term qualified tuition programs, shall not apply.

(2) In the case of any distribution made under Section
 529(c)(3)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the special rollover to Roth IRAs from long-term qualified tuition programs, treated for federal income tax purposes as a “qualified rollover contribution” under Section 408A(e)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, the amount of that distribution shall, notwithstanding Section 529 or Section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code to the contrary, be includable in the gross income of the distributee in the manner as provided under Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Any distribution includable in the gross income of a distributee under paragraph (2) shall not affect the exempt status of the qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 85.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23711.4.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, added by Section 102 of Division B of Public Law 113-295, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Section 529A(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting the phrase “under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and this part” in lieu of the phrase “under this subtitle.”

(2) By substituting “Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731)” in lieu of “Section 511.”

(b) Section 529A(c)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is
 modified by substituting “2.5 percent” in lieu of “10 percent.”

(c) A copy of the report required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 529A(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reports shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board at the same time and in the same manner as specified in that section.

(d) (1) The amendments made by Section 303(a) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) The amendments made by Section 303(b) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Sections 529A(d)(3) and 529A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE
 programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(3) The amendments made by Section 303(c) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Sections 529A(d)(4) and 529A(c)(1)(C)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(e) The amendments made by Section 11024(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529A(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(f) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amendments made by Section 124 of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023 (Public Law 117-328) to Section 529A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE
 programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) For purposes of complying with Section 41, the goal, purpose, objective, performance indicators, and data collection requirements for the tax expenditure allowed by this subdivision shall be as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 17140.4.

(g) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amendments made by Section 70204(a)(2) of Public Law 119-21 to Sections 529A(b)(2)(B), relating to cash contributions, and 529A(b)(6), relating to prohibition on excess contributions, of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 85, Sec. 9.   (SB 180)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23711.5.

The Golden State Scholarshare Trust, established pursuant to Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of the Education Code, is an instrumentality of this state and the income of the Scholarshare trust shall be exempt from taxes imposed under this part. The Scholarshare trust is established and shall be maintained as a qualified state tuition program as defined in Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24328 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 455, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23712.

Section 530 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to Coverdell education savings accounts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Section 530(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting the phrase “under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and this
 part” for the phrase “under this subtitle.”

(2) By substituting “Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731)” for “section 511.”

(b) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2002, Section 530(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to Coverdell education savings account, is modified to additionally require that upon the date that the designated beneficiary becomes 30 years of age, any balance to the credit of the beneficiary shall be distributed within 30 days after the date the beneficiary becomes 30 years of age to that beneficiary.

(c) Section 530(d) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting the phrase “under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) in the manner as provided in Section 72(b) of the Internal
 Revenue Code, as modified by Part 10” for the phrase “in the manner as provided in Section 72(b)” in Section 530(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) (A) By substituting the phrase “tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001)” for the phrase “tax imposed by this chapter” in Section 530(d)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) By substituting the phrase “increased by 212 percent” for the phrase “increased by 10 percent” in Section 530(d)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(C) By substituting the phrase “shall be included in the contributor’s gross income under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part” for the phrase “shall be included in gross income” in Section
 530(d)(4)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(D) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2005:

(i) By additionally providing that Section 530(d)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply if the payment or distribution is made on account of the attendance of the designated beneficiary at the United States Military Academy, the United States Naval Academy, the United States Air Force Academy, the United States Coast Guard Academy, or the United States Merchant Marine Academy, to the extent that the amount of the payment or distribution does not exceed the costs of advanced education (as defined by Section 2005(e)(3) of Title 10 of the United States Code, as in effect on November 11, 2003) attributable to that attendance.

(ii) The amendments made to this section by Section 12 of Chapter 552 of the Statutes
 of 2004 shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2002.

(d) For purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and this part, in the case of a custodial account treated as a trust by reason of Section 530(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, the custodian of that account shall be treated as the trustee thereof.

(e) A copy of the report, which is required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 530(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board at the same time and in the same manner as specified in that section.

(f) Section 109(d)(2) of Public Law 110-245, relating to application of amendments to deaths from injuries occurring on or after October 7, 2001, and before enactment, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 61.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Taxation of Business Income of Certain Article 1 Organizations [23731. - 23741.]

23731.

Every organization or trust exempt under this chapter, except as provided in this article, is subject to the tax imposed upon its unrelated business taxable income, as defined in Section 23732, as follows:

(a) Corporations (other than banks and financial corporations), associations, and business trusts are subject to the tax imposed under Section 23501.

(b) Trusts are subject to the tax imposed by subdivision (e) of Section
 17041.

This section applies to taxable years beginning after December 31, 1970.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23732.

Section 512 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to unrelated business taxable income, applies, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Section 512(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for foreign organizations, does not apply.

(b) Section 512(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue
 Code, relating to special rules applicable to organizations described in paragraph (7), (9), (17), or (20) of Section 501(c), shall be modified as follows:

(1) The reference to Section 501(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to refer to Section 23701g.

(2) The reference to Section 501(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to refer to Section 23701i.

(3) The reference to Section 501(c)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to refer to Section 23701n.

(4) The reference to Section 501(c)(20) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to refer to Section 23701q.

(c) Section 512(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of dues of
 agricultural or horticultural organizations, shall be modified by substituting “Section 23701a” for “Section 501(c)(5)” of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 490.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23734.

(a) Section 513 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to unrelated trade or business, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 513(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain pole rentals, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 39.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

23735.

(a) Section 514 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to unrelated debt-financed income, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 10214 of Public Law 100-203, relating to the treatment of certain partnership allocations, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990, for property acquired by the partnership after October 13, 1987, and partnership interests acquired after October 13, 1987.

(c) An interest in a participation agreement, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 69980 of the Education Code, shall not be treated as debt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23736.

Sections 23736.1 to 23736.4, inclusive, shall apply to any organization described in Section 23701d or Section 23701n except—

(a) A religious organization (other than a trust);

(b) An educational organization which normally maintains a regular faculty and curriculum and normally has a regularly enrolled body of pupils or students in attendance at the place where its educational activities are regularly carried on;

(c) An organization which normally receives a substantial part of
 its support (exclusive of income received in the exercise or performance by such organization of its charitable, educational, or other purpose or function constituting the basis for its exemption under Section 23701d) from the United States or any state or political subdivision thereof or from direct or indirect contributions from the general public;

(d) An organization which is operated, supervised, controlled, or principally supported by a religious organization (other than a trust) which is itself not subject to the provisions of this article; and

(e) An organization the principal purposes or functions of which are the providing of medical or hospital care or medical education or medical research.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 857.)
-------------------------------------------

23736.1.

(a) For the purposes of this article, the term “prohibited transaction” means any transaction in which an organization subject to this article—

(1) Lends any part of its income or corpus, without the receipt of adequate security and a reasonable rate of interest, to;

(2) Pays any compensation, in excess of a reasonable allowance for salaries or other compensation for personal services actually rendered,
 to;

(3) Makes any part of its services available on a preferential basis to;

(4) Makes any substantial purchase of securities or any other property, for more than adequate consideration in money or money’s worth, from;

(5) Sells any substantial part of its securities or other property, for less than an adequate consideration in money or money’s worth, to; or

(6) Engages in any other transaction that results in a substantial diversion of its income or corpus to; the creator of the organization (if a trust); a person who has made a substantial contribution to the organization; a member of the family (as defined in Section 267(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code) of an individual who is the creator of that trust or who has made a substantial contribution to
 that organization; or a corporation controlled by that creator or person through the ownership, directly or indirectly, of 50 percent or more of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or 50 percent or more of the total value of shares of all classes of stock of the corporation.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), a bond, debenture, note, or certificate or other evidence of indebtedness (hereinafter in this section referred to as “obligation”) acquired by a trust described in Section 23701n shall not be treated as a loan made without the receipt of adequate security if—

(1) The obligation is acquired—

(A) On the market, either (i) at the price of the obligation prevailing on a national securities exchange that is registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or (ii) if the
 obligation is not traded on a national securities exchange, at a price not less favorable to the trust than the offering price for the obligation as established by current bid and asked prices quoted by persons independent of the issuer;

(B) From an underwriter, at a price (i) not in excess of the public offering price for the obligation as set forth in a prospectus or offering circular filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, and (ii) at which a substantial portion of the same issue is acquired by persons independent of the issuer; or

(C) Directly from the issuer, at a price not less favorable to the trust than the price paid currently for a substantial portion of the same issue by persons independent of the issuer;

(2) Immediately following acquisition of that obligation—

(A) Not more than 25 percent of the aggregate amount of obligations issued in that issue and outstanding at the time of acquisition is held by the trust, and

(B) At least 50 percent of the aggregate amount referred to in subparagraph (A) is held by persons independent of the issuer; and

(3) Immediately following acquisition of the obligation, not more than 25 percent of the assets of the trust is invested in obligations of persons described in subdivision (a).

(4) (A) In the case of a trust described in Section 23701n, or in the case of a corporation described in Section 23701h, all of the stock of which was acquired before January 1, 1961, by a trust described in Section 23701n, any indebtedness incurred by that trust or that
 corporation before January 1, 1961, in connection with real property that is leased before January 1, 1961, and any indebtedness incurred by that trust or that corporation on or after that date necessary to carry out the terms of that lease, shall not be considered as an indebtedness with respect to that trust or that corporation for purposes of this section.

(B) In the application of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), if a trust described in Section 23701n forming part of a supplemental unemployment compensation benefit plan lends any money to another trust described in Section 23701n forming part of the same plan, that loan shall not be treated as an indebtedness of the borrowing trust, except to the extent that the loaning trust—

(i) Incurs any indebtedness in order to make that loan,

(ii) Incurred indebtedness
 before the making of that loan which would not have been incurred but for the making of that loan, or

(iii) Incurred indebtedness after the making of that loan which would not have been incurred but for the making of that loan and that was reasonably foreseeable at the time of making that loan.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a loan made by a trust described in Section 23701n to the employer (or to a renewal of that loan or, if the loan is repayable upon demand, to a continuation of that loan) if the loan bears a reasonable rate of interest, and if (in the case of a making or renewal)—

(1) The employer is prohibited (at the time of that making or renewal) by any law of the United States or regulation thereunder from directly or indirectly pledging, as security for the loan, a particular class or classes of his
 or her assets the value of which (at that time) represents more than one-half of the value of all his or her assets;

(2) The making or renewal, as the case may be, is approved in writing as an investment that is consistent with the exempt purposes of the trust by a trustee who is independent of the employer, and no other independent trustee had previously refused to give that written approval; and

(3) Immediately following the making or renewal, as the case may be, the aggregate amount loaned by the trust to the employer, without the receipt of adequate security, does not exceed 25 percent of the value of all the assets of the trust.

(4) For purposes of paragraph (2) the term “trustee” means, with respect to any trust for which there is more than one trustee who is independent of the employer, a majority of those
 independent trustees. For purposes of paragraph (3), the determination as to whether any amount loaned by the trust to the employer is loaned without the receipt of adequate security shall be made without regard to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 333.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

23736.2.
